Hawaii statutes.
§50-2 Definitions. Whenever used in
this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

"County" or "counties"
means the city and county of Honolulu and the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and
Maui.

"Legislative body of the county" means
the county council. [L 1963, c 73, pt of §2; Supp, §143A-2; HRS §50-2]

Revision Note

Definition of "chairman of the county" deleted as
obsolete. Definition of "legislative body of county" revised by
deleting references to board of supervisors and to city council of Honolulu.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next